en: Cooked fresh pasta stuffed with vegetables
fr: Pâtes fraîches cuites farcies aux légumes

en: Mushroom ravioli, mushroom raviolis
de: Pilzravioli, Pilz-Ravioli
es: Ravioli de champiñones
fr: Ravioli aux champignons, Raviolis champignons, Raviolis aux champignons, Ravioli champignons
hr: Ravioli s gljivama
hu: Gombás ravioli, Ravioli gombával
it: Ravioli ai funghi
nl: Paddestoelenraviolis

en: Ravioli with porcini mushrooms
de: Steinpilzravioli, Steinpilz-Ravioli
fr: Ravioli aux cèpes, Raviolis aux cèpes, Ravioli cèpes, Raviolis cèpes
hr: Ravioli s vrganjima
hu: Vargánya gombás ravioli, Ravioli vargánya gombával
nl: Eekhoorntjesbroodraviolis

en: Bucatini
xx: Bucatini
ja: ブカティーニ

en: Capellini
xx: Capellini

en: Spaghetti
bg: Спагети
ca: Espagueti
de: Spaghettis, Spaghetti
es: Espaguetis, Spaghetti
fi: spagetti
fr: Spaghetti, spaghettis
he: ספגטי
hr: špageti
hu: Spagetti
it: Spaghetti
ja: スパゲッティ
nl: Spaghettis
pl: Spaghetti
pt: Esparguete, espaguete
ru: Спагетти
tr: Spagetti

en: Durum wheat spaghetti
bg: Спагети от твърда пшеница
de: Hartweizenspaghetti, Hartweizen-Spaghetti
es: Espaguetis de trigo duro
fi: Durumvehnäspagetti
fr: Spaghettis de blé dur, spaghetti de blé dur, Spaghettis au blé dur
hr: Špagete od durum pšenice
it: Spaghetti di grano duro
nl: Durum tarwespaghettis, Durum tarwe spaghettis
ru: Спагетти из муки твёрдой пшеницы, спагетти из муки твердой пшеницы, спагетти группы А

en: Whole durum wheat spaghetti
bg: Пълнозърнести спагети от твърда пшеница
de: Vollkorn-Hartweizenspaghetti, Vollkorn-Spaghetti, Vollkornspaghetti
es: Spaghetti di grano duro integrali, Spaghetti integrali
fi: Täysjyväspagetti
fr: Spaghettis de blé dur complet, Spaghetti au blé dur complet, Spaghettis au blé dur complet, Spaghettis complet au blé dur, Spaghettis de blé complet, spaghettis au blé complet
hr: Špageti od cjelovite durum pšenice
nl: Volkoren durum tarwespaghettis, Volkorenspaghettis

fr: Spaghettis de petit épeautre, spaghetti au petit épeautre, Spaghettis au petit épeautre
nl: Speltspaghettis

en: Tagliatelle
xx: Tagliatelle
bg: Талиатели
es: Tallarines Tagliatelles
fr: Tagliatelles
ja: タリアテッレ
nl: Tagliatelles

en: Pasta with mushrooms
bg: Паста с гъби
de: Nudeln mit Pilzen
es: Pasta con champiñones
fr: Pâtes aux champignons
hr: Tjestenina s gljivama
it: Pasta ai funghi
nl: Pasta met champignons

fr: Tagliatelles aux champignons
bg: Талиатели с гъби
de: Champignon-Tagliatelle
es: Tagliatelle con champiñones
it: Tagliatelle ai funghi
nl: Tagliatelle met paddenstoelen

fr: Tagliatelles aux truffes
de: Trüffel-Tagliatelle
es: Tagliatelle con trufas
it: Tagliatelle al tartufo
nl: Tagliatelle met truffels

en: Pasta with meat
bg: Паста с месо
de: Nudeln mit Fleisch
es: Pasta con carne
fr: Pâtes à la viande
hr: Tjestenina s mesom
it: Pasta alla carne
nl: Pasta met vlees

en: Pasta with beef
bg: Паста с говеждо
de: Nudeln mit Rindfleisch
es: Pasta con carne de res
fr: Pâtes au boeuf
hr: Tjestenina s govedinom
it: Pasta al manzo
nl: Pasta met rundvlees

en: Pasta with pork
bg: Паста със свинско
de: Nudeln mit Schweinefleisch
es: Pasta con cerdo
fr: Pâtes au porc
hr: Tjestenina sa svinjetinom
it: Pasta al maiale
nl: Pasta met varkensvlees

en: Carbonara-style pasta
bg: Паста Карбонара
de: Nudeln nach Carbonara Art
es: Pasta estilo carbonara
fr: Pâtes à la carbonara
hr: Tjestenina na način carbonara
it: Pasta alla carbonara
nl: Carbonara-stijl pasta

en: Tagliatelle with carbonara, Tagliatelle Carbonara
de: Tagliatelle Carbonara
es: Tagliatelle a la carbonara
fr: Tagliatelles à la carbonara
hr: Tagliatelle s carbonarom
it: Tagliatelle alla carbonara
ja: タリアテッレ・アッラ・カルボナーラ
nl: Tagliatella carbonara

en: Spaghetti with carbonara
bg: Спагети Карбонара
de: Spaghetti Carbonara
es: Espaguetis a la carbonara
fr: Spaghetti à la carbonara
hr: Špagete s carbonarom
ja: スパゲッティ・アッラ・カルボナーラ
nl: Spaghetti Carbonara

en: Bolognese-style pasta
bg: Паста Болонезе
de: Bolognese-Nudeln
es: Pasta a la boloñesa
fr: Pâtes à la bolognaise
hr: Tjestenina na bolonjez
it: Pasta alla bolognese
nl: Bolognesesaus met pasta